en: trehalose
ar: طرهالوز
be: Трэгалоза
bg: трехалоза
ca: Trehalosa
cs: Trehalóza
da: trehalose
de: Trehalose
el: τρεαλόζη
es: trehalosa
et: trehaloos
eu: Trehalosa
fa: ترهالوز
fi: trehaloosi, sienisokeri
fr: tréhalose
gl: Trehalosa
he: טרהלוז
hr: trehaloza
hu: trehalóz
it: trealosio
ja: トレハロース
ko: 트레할로스
ms: Trehalosa
nl: trehalose
nn: trehalose
pa: ਤਰੇਹਾਲੋਸ
pl: trehaloza
pt: trealose
ro: Trehaloză
ru: трегалоза
sh: Trehaloza
sl: Trehaloza
sr: Trehaloza
sv: trehalos
uk: Трегалоза
vi: Trehalose
zh: 海藻糖

en: melado
de: Melado
hr: melado
it: melado
nl: melado

en: sugar coating
hr: šećer za dekoraciju
it: rivestimento di zucchero

en: syrup
ar: شراب
be: Сіроп
bg: Сироп
bs: Agda
ca: Xarop, suc
cs: sirup
cy: Surop
da: sirup
de: Sirup
el: σιρόπι
eo: Siropo
es: jarabe, sirope
fa: شربت
fi: siirappi
fr: sirop
fy: Sjerp
gl: Xarope
he: סירופ
hr: sirup
hu: szirup
id: Sirup
io: Siropo
is: siróp
it: sciroppo
ja: シロップ
jv: sirup
ko: 시럽
la: sirupus
li: sjroap
lt: sirupas
lv: sīrups
nb: sirup
nl: stroop, siroop
nn: sirup
pl: syrop
pt: xarope
ru: Сироп
sh: Sirup
sk: sirup
sl: sirup
so: Sharoobo
sv: sirap, Sockerlag
sw: Shira
th: ยาน้ำเชื่อม
tr: Şurup
uk: Сироп
vi: Xi rô
zh: 糖漿

en: glucose
af: Glukose
ar: جلوكوز
as: গ্লুক'জ
az: Qlükoza
be: Глюкоза
bg: Глюкоза
bn: গ্লুকোজ
bs: Glukoza
ca: Glucosa, glicosa
cs: Glukóza
da: glukose
de: Glukose, Glucose
el: Γλυκόζη
eo: Glukozo
es: glucosa
et: glükoos
eu: Glukosa
fa: گلوکز
fi: Glukoosi
fr: glucose
fy: glukoaze
ga: Glúcós
gl: Glicosa
he: גלוקוז
hi: ग्लूकोज़
hr: glukoza
hu: glükóz, szőlőcukor
hy: Գլյուկոզ
ia: Glucosa
id: Glukosa
io: Glikoso
is: Glúkósi
it: Glucosio
ja: グルコース, ブドウ糖, ぶどう糖
jv: Glukosa
ka: გლუკოზა
kk: Глюкоза
kn: ಗ್ಲುಕೋಸ್
ko: 글루코스
ku: Glukoz
ky: Глюкоза
la: Glucosum
lt: gliukozė
lv: glikoze
mk: Глукоза
ml: ഗ്ലൂക്കോസ്
mn: Глюкоз
ms: Glukosa
my: ဂလူးကို့သကြား
nb: Glukose
nl: glucose
nn: Glukose
no: glukose, glykose, druesukker
oc: Glucòsa
om: Giluukoosii
pa: ਗੁਲੂਕੋਸ
pl: Glukoza
pt: Glicose, glucose
qu: Uwas misk'i
ro: glucoză, glucosa
ru: Глюкоза
sh: Glukoza
si: ග්ලූකෝස්
sk: Glukóza
sl: Glukoza
sq: Glukoza
sr: Глукоза
su: Glukosa
sv: glukos, glykos
sw: Glukosi
ta: குளுக்கோசு
te: గ్లూకోస్
th: กลูโคส
tl: Glukosa
tr: Glukoz
tt: Глюкоза
ug: گلۇكوزا
uk: Глюкоза
ur: گلوکوز
uz: Glukoza
vi: Glucose
zh: 葡萄糖

en: glucose syrup
bg: глюкозен сироп, сироп от глюкоза, глюкозов сироп
bs: glukozni sirup
ca: xarop de glucosa
cs: glukózový sirup
da: glukosesirup, glucosesirup
de: Glukosesirup, Glucosesirup, Glukose-Sirup
el: σιρόπι γλυκόζης
es: jarabe de glucosa, sirope de glucosa
et: glükoosisiirup
eu: Almibar
fi: glukoosisiirappi, tärkkelyssiirappi, glukoosisiirappia, tärkkelyssiirappia
fr: sirop de glucose
gl: Almibre
he: סירופ גלוקוז
hr: glukozni sirup
hu: glükózszirup, glükóz szirup
is: glúkósasiróp, glukósasiróp
it: sciroppo di glucosio
ja: 水飴, 水あめ
ko: 글루코스 시럽
lt: gliukozės sirupas
lv: glikozes sīrups, giikozes sirups
nb: glukosesirup
nl: glucosestroop, glucosesiroop, glucose siroop
nn: glukosesirup
pl: syrop glukozowy, syrop glukozy
pt: xarope de glicose
ro: sirop de glucoză, sirop de glucoza
ru: Сироп глюкозы, глюкозный сироп, патока крахмальная
sk: glukózový sirup
sq: shurup glukoze
sr: glukozni sirup
sv: glukossirap, stärkelsesirap, glukos-sirap, glykossirap
tr: glikoz şurubu, glukoz şurubu, glükoz şurubu

en: fructose-free glucose syrup
de: fructosefreier Glucosesirup, fructosefreier Glukosesirup

en: dehydrated glucose syrup, powdered glucose syrup, dried glucose syrup
bg: дехидратиран глюкозен сироп, сироп от глюкоза на прах, изсушен глюкозен сироп
da: tørret glukosesirup
de: getrockneter Glukosesirup, dehydrierter Glukosesirup
es: Sirope deshidratado de glucosa, jarabe deshidratado de glucosa, jarabe de glucosa deshidratado, sirope de glucosa deshidratado
fi: kuivattu glukoosisiirappi
fr: sirop de glucose déshydraté, sirop de glucose en poudre
hr: osušeni glukozni sirup
hu: dehidratált glükózszirup, szárított glükózszirup, dehidratált glükóz szirup, szárított glükóz szirup
it: sciroppo di glucosio disidratato
nl: gedroogde glucosestroop
pl: suszony syrop glukozowy
sv: torkad glukossirap

en: potato glucose syrup
it: sciroppo di glucosio di patate
pl: syrop glukozowy z ziemniaków, ziemniaczany syrop glukozowy

en: mizuame
xx: mizuame
de: Mizuame
fa: میزوآمه
ja: 麦水飴
pa: ਮਿਜ਼ੂਆਮੇ
zh: 水飴

en: corn glucose syrup, corn glucose
es: sirope de glucosa de maíz, jarabe de glucosa de maíz, glucosa de maíz
fr: sirop de glucose de maïs, glucose de maïs
it: sciroppo di glucosio di mais
pl: syrop glukozowy z kukurydzy, syrop glukozowy kukurydziany
sv: majsglukossirap

en: wheat glucose syrup
bg: пшеничен глюкозен сироп, глюкозен сироп от пшеница
de: Weizenglukosesirup
es: Sirope de glucosa de trigo, jarabe de glucosa de trigo
fi: vehnäglukoosisiirappi
fr: sirop de glucose de blé
hr: pšeničnog glukoznog sirupa
hu: búza glükózszirup, glükózszirup búzából, búza glükóz szirup, glükóz szirup búzából
it: sciroppo di glucosio di frumento
nl: tarweglucosestroop
pl: syrop glukozowy z pszenicy
pt: xarope de glucose de trigo
sv: glukossirap från vetemjöl

en: glucose powder
bg: глюкоза на прах
da: glukosepulver
de: Glukosepulver
fr: Poudre de glucose
hr: glukoza u prahu
it: glucosio in polvere

en: fructose
xx: fructose
af: fruktose
ar: فركتوز
be: фруктоза
bg: фруктоза
bn: ফ্রুক্টোজ
bs: fruktoza
ca: fructosa
cs: fruktóza
da: fruktose
de: Fructose, Fruktose, Fruchtzucker
el: φρουκτόζη
eo: fruktozo
es: fructosa
et: fruktoos
eu: fruktosa
fa: فروکتوز
fi: fruktoosi, hedelmäsokeri
fr: fructose
fy: fruktoaze
gl: frutosa
he: פרוקטוז
hr: fruktoza
hu: fruktóz
hy: լևուլոզ
id: fruktosa
is: ávaxtasykur
it: fruttosio
ja: フルクトース
kk: фруктоза
ko: 프럭토스
ku: fruktoz
ky: фруктоза
la: fructosum
lb: fruktos
lo: ນ້ຳຕານໝາກໄມ້
lt: fruktozė
lv: fruktoze
mg: froktôzy
mk: фруктоза
ms: fruktosa
nb: fruktose, fruktsukker
nl: fructose
nn: fruktose
oc: fructòsa
pl: fruktoza, fruktozowy, fruktozy
pt: frutosa, frutose
qu: wayu misk'i
ro: fructoză
ru: фруктоза
sh: fruktoza
sl: fruktóza
sq: fruktoza
sr: fruktoza
sv: fruktos, fruktsocker
ta: புருக்டோசு
tg: фруктоза
th: ฟรักโทส
tl: pruktosa
tr: fruktoz
tt: fruktoza
uk: фруктоза
ur: فرکٹوس
vi: fructose
zh: 果糖

en: fructose syrup
bg: фруктозен сироп
de: Fruktose Sirup, Fruktosesirup
es: Jarabe de fructosa, sirope de fructosa
fi: fruktoosisiirappi, fruktoosisiirappia
fr: sirop de fructose
hr: fruktozni sirup
it: sciroppo di fruttosio
nl: fructosestroop, fructosesiroop
pl: syrop fruktozowy, syrop z fruktozy
pt: Xarope de fructose
sl: fruktozni sirup
sv: fruktossirap

en: fructose powder
de: Fruktosepulver
fi: fruktoosijauhe
it: fruttosio in polvere

en: oligofructose
bg: олигофруктоза
da: oligofruktose, oligofructose
de: Oligofructose, Oligofruktose
es: oligofructosa
fi: oligofruktoosi
fr: oligofructose
he: אוליגופרוקטוז
hr: oligofruktoza
hu: oligofruktóz
it: oligofruttosio
lv: oligofruktoze
nb: oligofruktose
nl: oligofructose
pl: oligofruktoza
ro: oligofructoză
sv: oligofruktos

en: oligofructose syrup
bg: сироп от олигофруктоза
de: Oligofruktosesirup
es: jarabe de oligofructosa, sirope de oligofructosa
fi: oligofruktoosisiirappi
fr: sirop d'oligofructose
hr: oligofruktozni sirup
it: sciroppo di oligofruttosio
nl: oligofructosestroop

en: oligofructose fibre
it: fibra di oligofruttosio

en: glucoligosaccharide
it: glucoligosaccaride